Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2238
Disciplinary action; denial of application; grounds.

The following acts and omissions shall be considered grounds for disciplinary action or denial of an application by the board:

(1) Failure to meet the minimum qualifications for credentialing established by or pursuant to the Real Property Appraiser Act;

(2) Procuring or attempting to procure a credential under the act by knowingly making a false statement, submitting false information, or making a material misrepresentation in an application filed with the board or procuring or attempting to procure a credential through fraud or misrepresentation;

(3) Paying money or other valuable consideration other than the fees provided for by the act to any member or employee of the board to procure a credential;

(4) An act or omission involving real estate or real property appraisal practice which constitutes dishonesty, fraud, or misrepresentation with or without the intent to substantially benefit the credential holder or another person or with the intent to substantially injure another person;

(5) Failure to demonstrate character and general fitness such as to command the confidence and trust of the public;

(6) Conviction, including a conviction based upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of any felony unless his or her civil rights have been restored;

(7) Entry of a final civil or criminal judgment, including dismissal with settlement, on grounds of fraud, dishonesty, breach of trust, money laundering, misrepresentation, or deceit involving real estate, financial services, or real property appraisal practice;

(8) Conviction, including a conviction based upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of a crime which is related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a real property appraiser;

(9) Performing valuation services as a credentialed real property appraiser under an assumed or fictitious name;

(10) Paying a finder's fee or a referral fee to any person in connection with a real property appraisal practice assignment, except that an intracompany payment for business development shall not be considered to be unethical or a violation of this subdivision;

(11) Making a false or misleading statement in that portion of a written report that deals with professional qualifications or in any testimony concerning professional qualifications;

(12) Any violation of the act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;

(13) Failure to maintain, or to make available for inspection and copying, records required by the board;

(14) Demonstrating negligence, incompetence, or unworthiness to act as a real property appraiser, whether of the same or of a different character as otherwise specified in this section;

(15) Suspension or revocation of an appraisal credential or a license in another regulated occupation, trade, or profession in this or any other jurisdiction or disciplinary action taken by another jurisdiction that limits the real property appraiser's ability to engage in real property appraisal practice;

(16) Failure to renew or surrendering an appraisal credential or any other registration, license, or certification issued by any other regulatory agency or held in any other jurisdiction in lieu of disciplinary action pending or threatened;

(17) Failure to report disciplinary action taken against an appraisal credential or any other registration, license, or certification issued by any other regulatory agency or held in any other jurisdiction within sixty days of receiving notice of such disciplinary action;

(18) Failure to comply with terms of a consent agreement or settlement agreement;

(19) Failure to submit or produce books, records, documents, workfiles, reports, or other materials requested by the board concerning any matter under investigation;

(20) Failure of an education provider to produce records, documents, reports, or other materials, including, but not limited to, required student attendance reports, to the board;

(21) Knowingly offering or attempting to offer a qualifying or continuing education course or activity as being approved by the board to a real property appraiser or an applicant, without first obtaining approval of the activity from the board, except for courses required by an accredited degree-awarding college or university for completion of a degree in real estate, if the college or university had its curriculum approved by the Appraiser Qualifications Board as qualifying education;

(22) Presentation to the Real Property Appraiser Board of any check which is returned to the State Treasurer unpaid, whether payment of fee is for an initial or renewal credential or for examination; and

(23) Failure to pass the examination.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 38;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 42;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 39;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 30;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 60;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 21;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 23;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 59;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 18;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 34;

Laws 2019, LB77, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 83.